Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-710
American Sign Language.

The State Department of Education may provide for the teaching of American Sign Language in public, private, denominational, and parochial schools. If a school offers a course in American Sign Language, such course shall be offered to all students and may be used for world language credits by the school.

Laws 2020, LB965, § 2.